Vermont, session 2025-2026, S199.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 18 V.S.A. chapter 91, subchapter 7 is added to read:
Subchapter 7. Vermont Prescription Drug Discount Card Program
§ 4691. VERMONT PRESCRIPTION DRUG DISCOUNT CARD
PROGRAM
(a) There is established the Vermont Prescription Drug Discount Card
Program, administered by the Office of the State Treasurer, for the purpose of
pooling prescription drug purchasing power with other U.S. states and
VT LEG #385905 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.199
2026 Page 2 of 4
territories and nongovernmental organizations. The Program shall be made
available to all Vermont residents.
(b)(1) To further the purposes of the Program, the State Treasurer may
cooperate with other U.S. states and territories, regional consortia, or
nongovernmental organizations, or a combination of these, to pool prescription
drug purchasing power to:
(A) reduce prescription drug costs;
(B) negotiate discounts with prescription drug manufacturers;
(C) centralize prescription drug purchasing; and
(D) establish volume discount contracting.
(2) As used in subdivision (1)(D) of this subsection, “volume discount
contracting” means the negotiated purchase of a large quantity of a prescription
drug at a decreased cost.
(c) The Treasurer may require that reasonable fees be charged to defray
Program costs. Notwithstanding any provision of 32 V.S.A. § 603 to the
contrary, the amount and method of collection of any fee shall be determined
by the Treasurer based on actual costs.
(d) On or before January 15, 2028, and annually thereafter, the State
Treasurer shall submit a report to the House Committee on Health Care, the
Senate Committee on Health and Welfare, and the Governor detailing the
activities of the Program during the previous calendar year, including the
VT LEG #385905 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.199
2026 Page 3 of 4
number of Vermont residents and pharmacies participating in the Program and
the amount of savings on prescription drug costs achieved.
§ 4692. VERMONT PRESCRIPTION DRUG DISCOUNT CARD
PROGRAM FUND
(a) The Vermont Prescription Drug Discount Card Program Fund is
established as a special fund to be administered by the State Treasurer to
support the Vermont Prescription Drug Discount Card Program established in
this subchapter.
(b) The Fund shall consist of:
(1) any monies appropriated to the Fund by the General Assembly;
(2) any monies transferred to the Fund from the federal government,
other State agencies, or other government source;
(3) any monies from the payment of fees or other monies due to the
Program; and
(4) any gifts, grants, or donations made to the Fund and any gifts, grants,
donations, or investments received by the Treasurer for the Program.
(c) The Treasurer shall credit to the Fund all interest earned on Fund
balances and any other income derived from the deposit and investment of
monies in the Fund.
(d) Any unexpended and unencumbered monies in the Fund at the end of a
fiscal year shall remain in the Fund.
VT LEG #385905 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.199
2026 Page 4 of 4
Sec. 2. VERMONT PRESCRIPTION DRUG DISCOUNT CARD
PROGRAM; IMPLEMENTATION REPORT
On or before January 15, 2027, the State Treasurer shall report to the
General Assembly regarding implementation of the Vermont Prescription Drug
Discount Card Program established in 18 V.S.A. chapter 91, subchapter 7, as
added by Sec. 1 of this act, as of that date, including any recommendations for
improving the administration of the Program, any fees to be charged to
participants, and an estimate of the projected costs to the State in the event that
additional financial support is determined to be necessary to administer the
Program.
Sec. 3. VERMONT PRESCRIPTION DRUG DISCOUNT CARD
PROGRAM; EVALUATION AND START-UP FUNDING
In fiscal year 2027, the sum of $50,000.00 is appropriated from the General
Fund to the Office of the State Treasurer for the costs of developing and
implementing the Vermont Prescription Drug Discount Card Program as set
forth in this act.
Sec. 4. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
VT LEG #385905 v.1